Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 2. Fish Provisions

§ 23-3-201.
Fishing tackle; designation of waters for setline fishing; taking fish with firearm prohibited; snagging; penalties.

Except as otherwise provided, fish may only be taken or fished for with a maximum of two (2) rods or poles, with lines and hooks attached, and with the user in attendance.

No line shall have more than three (3) single or treble hooks, flies or lures. As used in this section:

“Hook” means a single device regardless of the number of prongs; and

“Lure” means a single device regardless of the number of hooks.

The commission may designate specified waters as being open to setline fishing and the number of setlines to be used. In those waters subsection (a) does not apply. The commission may also designate specified waters in which otherwise permissible tackle or bait may not be used.

No person shall take, wound or destroy any fish of Wyoming with a firearm of any kind or nature.

No person shall snag any fish of Wyoming except as specifically authorized by the commission. For purposes of this subsection, “snag” means attempting to take a fish in such a manner that the fish does not take the hook voluntarily in its mouth.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 83, § 93; 1925, ch. 137, § 31; R.S. 1931, § 49-195; C.S. 1945, § 47-506; Laws 1949, ch. 88, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 23-107; Laws 1961, ch. 93, § 1; 1971, ch. 5, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-70; Laws 1993, ch. 2, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (f) by revising the punishable misdemeanor and deleting the last sentence which read: “Violation of subsection (d) of this section constitutes an 8th degree misdemeanor.”

§ 23-3-202.
Use of live fish and corn as bait.

The commission may designate specified waters in which live fish or corn may be used as bait, and may designate the types of and origin of live fish which may be used as bait in any waters.

No person shall have any live fish or bait corn in his possession while fishing other than as authorized by the commission.

No person shall release any live baitfish unless authorized by the commission.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 73; 1943, ch. 112, § 12; 1945, ch. 150, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 47-504; Laws 1951, ch. 155, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-106; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-71; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “an 11th degree misdemeanor” in (d).

§ 23-3-203.
Placing obstruction to fish across stream or lake without consent of chief fish warden prohibited; erection of fishways.

No person shall erect or place, or cause to be erected or placed, any net, trotline, or any similar obstruction across any river, creek, pond, or lake so as to prevent the free passage of the fish up, down, or through the water except with the consent and under the direction of the chief fish warden.

The commission may erect or cause to be erected and maintained fishways or ladders on any dam or other structures across any stream of the state, when a fishway or ladder is necessary for the uninterrupted passage of fish up and down the stream.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 81, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 47-509; W.S. 1957, § 23-116; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-72; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to construction of devices to prevent fish from entering irrigation works or reservoirs, see §

41-5-106

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “10th degree misdemeanor” in (c).

§ 23-3-204.
Substances and devices to take or destroy fish or obstruct waterways prohibited.

No person shall take or destroy fish in Wyoming by using any poison or deleterious drug, electrical device, chemical, explosive, or any similar substance or device except by commission order.

No person shall allow any refuse or substance to pass into any public water:

Which drives away or is injurious to fish, or wildlife; or

Which obstructs the natural flow, channels, or condition of any stream or body of water.

Violation of this section constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 83, § 99; 1929, ch. 93, § 30; R.S. 1931, § 49-201; C.S. 1945, § 47-508; W.S. 1957, § 23-115; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-73; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “1st degree misdemeanor” in (c).

§ 23-3-205.
Shipment of fish; game tags; when required.

No person shall ship or transport or receive for shipment or transportation any game fish either within or without the state except as provided in subsection (b).

Any person lawfully taking any game fish in this state may ship not to exceed one (1) limit in a single container no oftener than once a week if a Wyoming interstate game tag is affixed to the container. No interstate game tag is required for the transportation of one (1) limit of fish in the possession of a properly licensed fisherman.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 82; C.S. 1945, § 47-521; W.S. 1957, § 23-114; Laws 1969, ch. 141, § 2; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-74; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “an 11th degree misdemeanor” in (c).